Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5691.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 72. (1) As soon as practicable after the filing of a petition, the drain commissioner authorized to act on the petition, if not disqualified under section 381 to make the apportionment of benefits, may appoint a board of determination composed of 3 disinterested property owners. If the drain commissioner is disqualified or chooses not to appoint the board of determination, the drain commissioner shall immediately file a copy of the petition with the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, together with a statement, signed by the drain commissioner, that he or she the drain commissioner is disqualified or chooses not to act in appointing appoint a board of determination. As soon as practicable after receiving a copy of the petition and certificate, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, unless he or she the chairperson has a conflict of interest, shall appoint a board of determination composed of 3 disinterested property owners. and The chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall immediately notify the drain commissioner of the names and addresses of those appointed. If the chairperson of the county board of commissioners has a conflict of interest, in the proceedings, the drain committee of the county board of commissioners shall appoint the board of determination. Members Two members of boards the board of determination shall must be residents of the county but not of a township, city, or village affected by the drain, and shall must not be members of the county board of commissioners. of the county.One member of the board of determination must be a resident of the township, city, or village affected by the drain. (2) The drain commissioner shall call a meeting of the board of determination at a convenient place within the drainage district or at a public building within a city, village, or township in which the drain is located. If an individual appointed to the board of determination fails or refuses to serve, the drain commissioner officer or committee that appointed the individual shall appoint a successor. The per diem compensation and the mileage and expense reimbursements of a member of the board of determination shall must be the same as for a member of the county board of commissioners of the county. In counties where commissioners are not paid on a per diem basis, the compensation and the mileage and expense reimbursements shall for a member of the board of determination must be set by the drain commissioner. Upon On request, the county drain commissioner shall inform in writing the requesting state legislator who represents the area in which the proposed drain improvement is to be constructed of the names and addresses of the persons individuals appointed to a board of determination. (3) The drain commissioner shall give public notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting of the board of determination in the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. The drain commissioner shall also give such notice, not less than 10 days before the meeting, by all of the following means: (a) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. (b) Service on the county clerk and a member of the board of county road commissioners of the county and on the supervisor of each township and clerk of each city and village in the drainage district, personally or by certified mail. (c) Service by first-class mail on each person whose name appears on the last city, village, or township tax roll as owning land within the drainage district, at the address shown on the roll. If an a person's address does not appear on the roll, a notice need not be mailed to the person. The drain commissioner shall make state in an affidavit of the mailing and shall recite in the affidavit that the notice was mailed to all of the persons whose names and addresses appear upon on the tax rolls as owning land within the drainage district. The affidavit is conclusive proof that notice was mailed to each person to whom notice is required to be mailed under this section. subdivision. The failure to receive a notice by mail is not a jurisdictional defect invalidating a drain proceeding or drain assessment if notice was sent by first class first-class mail as provided in this subdivision. (4) All expenses of notification shall under this section must be paid by the drainage district when created. (5) At the time and place specified in the notice, the board of determination shall meet, elect a chairperson and secretary, and, after considering the evidence offered, determine the necessity of the proposed drain and whether the proposed drain is necessary and conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare. The board of determination , if it considers it necessary, shall may require the county drain commissioner to obtain from the county treasurer a statement showing the amount of taxes and special assessments levied against the land in the proposed drainage district on the tax rolls for the immediately preceding 3 years and the amount of the taxes and assessments remaining unpaid. If it appears from the statement indicates that 25% or more of the taxes are unpaid on the lands, further action shall must not be taken on the petition. If the board of determination finds, by a majority vote of the members, that the drain is not necessary and conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare, the board of determination shall file with the drain commissioner a determination of no necessity and an order dismissing the petition, and a further another petition for the drain shall must not be filed within 1 year after the determination. If the board of determination finds, by a majority vote of the members, that the proposed drain is necessary and conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare, the board of determination shall make an order to that effect and file the an order of necessity with the drain commissioner. Not more than (6) Not later than 10 days after the board of determination files an order finding the proposed drain to be necessary and conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare, of necessity, the drain commissioner shall determine the cities, townships, and villages within the drainage district benefiting at large from the drain for public health and shall notify each such city, township, and village that it is liable to pay a percent of the cost of construction of the drain by reason of benefits at large for public health. (7) Within Not later than 20 days after the commissioner's receipt of the order of the board of determination , if an appeal has not been taken under section 72a, files an order of necessity, the drain commissioner shall make a first order of determination in writing. , giving The order shall set forth the name or number of the drainage district and a general description of the route, terminus, and type of construction of the drain. The drain commissioner shall file a copy of the order in his or her the drain commissioner's office. Sec. 72a. Whenever the board of determination finds by majority vote of the whole number of members that the drain is or is not necessary, any A person feeling that feels aggrieved by the determination of the board of determination may institute an action in the circuit court for the county in which the real property is located for a determination of necessity. The If the board of determination finds that the drain is not necessary, the action shall must be filed by the person aggrieved within 10 not later than 60 days after the determination of necessity or no necessity by the board of determination is filed with the drain commissioner. If the board of determination finds that the drain is necessary, the action must be filed not later than 21 days after the day of review under section 154.